Illinois, session 104th, SB3762.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Tenant 5Opportunity to Purchase Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Affordable housing restrictive covenant" means an 8agreement between the purchaser and the State in which the 9purchaser agrees to affordability restrictions memorialized in 10an affordability covenant in a form approved by the Illinois 11Housing Development Authority and enforceable by the State as 12a third-party beneficiary. The affordability restrictions in 13each affordable housing restrictive covenant extend for a 14period of not less than 30 years from the sale, subject to 15exceptions as the Illinois Housing Development Authority may 16provide for by rule.17    "Affordability restrictions" means limits on rents and 18income for persons or families seeking to qualify as tenants 19in the rental property.20    "Affordable housing" means that the value of rents paid by 21tenants are restricted based on the Illinois Housing 22Development Authority's formula for affordability for a 60% 23area median income limit, and that the gross household income   SB3762- 2 -LRB104 18761 JRC 32204 b1of new tenants in the rental property may not exceed 80% of the 2area median income.3    "Good faith negotiations" means:4        (1) whether the party or any of its agents knowingly 5    made any misrepresentations of material fact to the other 6    party or of its agents during the negotiation period;7        (2) whether the party or any of its agents failed to 8    provide in a timely fashion any information legitimately 9    requested by the other party or any of its agents during 10    the negotiation period;11        (3) whether the party or any of its agents failed to 12    allow in a timely fashion any legitimate inspection of the 13    property requested by the other party or any of its agents 14    during the negotiation period;15        (4) whether the party or any of its agents engaged in 16    any other conduct that would constitute a lack of good 17    faith under the standard imposed by the Uniform Commercial 18    Code; and19        (5) whether the party or any of its agents engaged in 20    any other conduct that displays a price adjustment that 21    would substantially interfere with the tenants or tenant 22    association rights under this Act.23    "Just cause eviction" means any eviction for serious or 24repeated violations of the terms and conditions of a lease or 25occupancy agreement, for a violation of applicable federal, 26State, or local laws or for other good cause.  SB3762- 3 -LRB104 18761 JRC 32204 b1    "Material change" means any change in contract terms that 2result in a new purchaser and a change in the sales asking 3price of 10% or more than 10% from the original contract 4listing price.5    "Owner" means the person, firm, partnership, corporation, 6trust, organization, limited liability company or other 7entity, or its successors or assigns that holds title to a 8rental property.9    "Purchaser" means a party who has entered into a purchase 10contract with an owner and who will, upon performance of the 11purchase contract, become the new owner of the rental 12property.13    "Rental property" means any occupied residential rental 14building or a group of residential rental buildings operated 15as one entity.16    "Rental unit" or "unit" means a room or suite of rooms 17designed, occupied or intended for occupancy as a separate 18living quarter with cooking, sleeping, and sanitary facilities 19provided within the unit for the exclusive use of the 20occupants of the unit.21    "Sale" or "sell" means an act by which an owner conveys, 22transfers, or disposes of rental property by deed or 23otherwise, whether through a single transaction or a series of 24transactions, including: (i) transfer of title to rental 25property; (ii) transfer of a majority interest in owner; or 26(iii) lease of rental property for more than 7 years.  SB3762- 4 -LRB104 18761 JRC 32204 b1    "Tenant" means a natural person entitled by written or 2oral agreement or by sufferance to occupy a rental unit to the 3exclusion of others, and who is residing in a rental unit at 4the time of a notification under Section 20. If more than one 5tenant is listed on a lease, any of the tenants may exercise 6the rights granted under this Act.7    "Tenant association" means an association of tenants, 8whether incorporated or not, for which written consent to 9forming a tenant association has been given by tenants 10representing at least 75% of the occupied units in a rental 11property with 5 or more units; or at least 50% of the occupied 12units in a rental property with 4 or fewer units. The tenants 13agreeing to participate in the tenant association must signify 14their consent to form a tenant association by signing a form 15provided by the Illinois Housing Development Authority. The 16percentage must be calculated based on the number of occupied 17rental units in a rental property rather than the number of 18individuals listed on leases as tenants.19    "Third-party purchase agreement" means an arm's length 20third-party agreement in which an owner agrees to sell a 21rental property, including, without limitation, a purchase and 22sale agreement, contract of sale, purchase option, or other 23similar instrument.24    "Title" means a legal or equitable ownership interest in a 25rental property; or a legal, equitable, or beneficial interest 26in a partnership, limited partnership, corporation, trust, or   SB3762- 5 -LRB104 18761 JRC 32204 b1other entity that has a legal or equitable ownership interest 2in a rental property. 3    Section 10. Right of first refusal conferred. This Act 4shall be construed to confer a right of first refusal to 5purchase any rental property for sale under the terms set 6forth herein on each tenant association or tenant. 7    Section 15. Exceptions. The requirements of this Act do 8not apply to the transfers identified below but apply to any 9subsequent transfer to a nonexempt party:10        (1) a transfer of legal title or an interest in an 11    entity holding legal title to a rental property under a 12    deed of trust or mortgage, and thereafter any transfer by 13    foreclosure sale or deed in lieu of foreclosure under a 14    deed of trust or mortgage to an entity not affiliated with 15    the owner;16        (2) a transfer made in connection with any bankruptcy 17    proceeding including, but not limited to, any transfer 18    made by a bankruptcy trustee; 19        (3) a tax sale or transfer by a tax foreclosure;20        (4) a transfer by devise or intestacy, or any other 21    transfer made in connection with a bona fide effort to 22    pass an interest in real property to one's devisees or 23    heirs including, but not limited to, transfers made in 24    connection with a living trust;  SB3762- 6 -LRB104 18761 JRC 32204 b1        (5) a transfer between or among spouses, domestic 2    partners, siblings including, but not limited to, 3    half-siblings, step-siblings, and adoptive siblings; 4    parents including, but not limited to, step-parents and 5    adoptive parents or guardians and their children; 6    grandparents, and their grandchildren; aunts or uncles and 7    their nieces or nephews, great-aunts or great-uncles and 8    their grand-nieces or grand-nephews; or first cousins; or 9    any combination thereof;10        (6) a transfer of bare legal title into a revocable 11    trust, without actual consideration for the transfer, in 12    which the transferor is the current beneficiary of the 13    trust;14        (7) a transfer to a named beneficiary of a revocable 15    trust by reason of the death of the grantor of the 16    revocable trust;17        (8) a transfer by the trustee of a revocable trust if 18    the transfer would otherwise be excluded under this Act if 19    made by the grantor of the revocable trust;20        (9) a transfer under court order or court-approved 21    settlement;22        (10) a transfer by eminent domain or negotiated 23    purchase under threat of eminent domain; or24        (11) a transfer directly caused by a change in the 25    form of the entity owning the rental property.   SB3762- 7 -LRB104 18761 JRC 32204 b1    Section 20. Notice of intent to sell. 2    (a) Notice before listing required. The owner must provide 3notice to the Illinois Housing Development Authority and to 4the tenant association, or if no tenant association exists, to 5each tenant, of the owner's intent to sell no less than 60 days 6before listing or otherwise offering a rental property for 7sale for a multi-unit residential building with 5 or more 8dwelling units; or no less than 30 days before listing or 9otherwise offering a rental property for sale for a multi-unit 10residential building with 4 or fewer dwelling units. The 11notice must be delivered in person or mailed, by certified or 12registered mail, return receipt requested, on a form provided 13by the Illinois Housing Development Authority, and contain the 14following information: 15        (1) the name, address, and telephone number of each 16    owner of the rental property;17        (2) the address of the rental property; 18        (3) a description of the rental property, including 19    the number of units and the number of bedrooms within each 20    unit; 21        (4) the proposed asking price for the rental property; 22        (5) a statement that the owner intends to sell the 23    rental property; and 24        (6) a summary of tenant rights under this Act. The 25    owner shall also post a notice of intent to sell in a form 26    provided by the Illinois Housing Development Authority at   SB3762- 8 -LRB104 18761 JRC 32204 b1    all public entrances to the rental property. 2    The owner must keep all return receipts required by this 3subsection for a period of 3 years after the sale of the rental 4property and make the receipts available for inspection by the 5Illinois Housing Development Authority at all times during the 6owner's business hours.7    (b) Additional disclosures. The tenant association, or if 8no tenant association exists, any tenant in the rental 9property, or the Illinois Housing Development Authority, may 10in writing, at any time after receipt of the owner's notice of 11intent to sell, request the following additional information:12        (1) the most recent rent roll, including each unit 13    number and the monthly rent charged for each unit;14        (2) a list of vacant apartments and a statement of the 15    rental property's vacancy rate during the preceding 12 16    months;17        (3) the income and expense report for the 12-month 18    period before the notice, including capital improvements, 19    real property taxes and other municipal charges; and20        (4) any other information the Illinois Housing 21    Development Authority may specify by rule.22    The owner has 30 calendar days from receipt of the request 23to provide the information. 24    Section 25. Right of first refusal. 25    (a) Notice of offer. If the owner receives and accepts a   SB3762- 9 -LRB104 18761 JRC 32204 b1bona fide offer from a third party to purchase the rental 2property, then the owner must promptly provide written notice 3of the offer ("Notice of Sale") to the Illinois Housing 4Development Authority and to the tenant association, or if no 5tenant association exists, to each tenant in the rental 6property. Any third-party purchase agreement is contingent 7upon the right of first refusal set forth in this Act. The 8Notice of Sale must include an executed duplicate original of 9the third-party purchase agreement and the disclosures set 10forth in subsection (b) of Section 20, unless the owner has 11previously made the disclosures and the disclosures remain 12accurate and complete.13    (b) Time for tenants to form organization. To exercise its 14right of first refusal to purchase a rental property:15        (1) the tenants of a rental property consisting of 5 16    or more dwelling units have 90 calendar days from receipt 17    of the Notice of Sale to:18            (A) form a tenant association;19            (B) inform the owner and the Illinois Housing 20        Development Authority of its existence; and21            (C) provide to the owner and the Illinois Housing 22        Development Authority the names, addresses, and 23        telephone numbers of at least 2 of the officers or 24        representatives of the association;25        (2) the tenants of a rental property consisting of 3 26    or 4 dwelling units have 30 calendar days from receipt of   SB3762- 10 -LRB104 18761 JRC 32204 b1    the Notice of Sale to form a tenant association and inform 2    the owner and the Illinois Housing Development Authority 3    of its existence; and4        (3) at least one tenant of a rental property 5    consisting of one or 2 dwelling units has 15 calendar days 6    to inform the owner of its intent to exercise its right of 7    first refusal.8    (c) Negotiation. Any negotiations between the owner, or 9the owner's agents, and a tenant association or, in the case of 10a rental property consisting of one or 2 dwelling units, one or 11both tenants, or an agent, require a continuing duty of good 12faith negotiations on the part of all parties involved in the 13negotiation and transaction.14    (d) Exercise right of first refusal.15        (1) A tenant association or, in the case of a rental 16    property consisting of one or 2 dwelling units, at least 17    one tenant, exercise its right of first refusal by 18    delivering written notice to the owner before the 19    expiration of the period required in subsection (b) that 20    the tenant association or tenant, as applicable, elects to 21    purchase the rental property under this Act.22        (2) Notice to the owner that the right of first 23    refusal is being exercised must be accompanied by any 24    earnest money required under the terms of the third-party 25    purchase agreement, subject to the cap set forth in 26    Section 30.  SB3762- 11 -LRB104 18761 JRC 32204 b1        (3) The contract formed by exercise of the right of 2    first refusal is on the same terms and conditions as those 3    set forth in the third-party purchase agreement as 4    modified by the terms of this Act.5        (4) Notwithstanding this general requirement or any 6    term of the third-party purchase agreement, any such 7    acceptance is presumed to be contingent upon the tenant 8    association's, or tenant's, ability to conduct due 9    diligence and secure financing before the deadline in 10    subsection (e) for completing the sale.11        (5) Nothing in this Section may be construed to 12    require any owner to extend any form of owner financing to 13    tenants or a tenant association.14        (6) If tenants fail to meet the requirements by the 15    timelines set by this Act, then the ability to exercise 16    the right of first refusal terminates.17    (e) Time for closing.18        (1) If a tenant association, or tenant under paragraph 19    (3) of subsection (b), exercises its right of first 20    refusal in accordance with subsection (d), then the tenant 21    association or tenant must conduct due diligence and 22    secure financing within:23            (A) 120 calendar days from the date of the notice 24        in rental properties consisting of 5 or more dwelling 25        units; or26            (B) 60 calendar days in rental properties   SB3762- 12 -LRB104 18761 JRC 32204 b1        consisting of 4 or fewer dwelling units unless the 2        owner and the tenant association, or tenant, have 3        expressly agreed otherwise in writing.4        (2) The owner must give the tenant association or 5    tenant any information about the rental property that the 6    tenant association or tenant reasonably requests, such as 7    architectural and engineering plans and specifications, if 8    available, and access to the rental property to inspect it 9    and conduct reasonable tests at reasonable times after 10    reasonable notice.11        (3) At the end of this 120-day period, 60-day period, 12    or any other period that has been agreed upon in writing, 13    as applicable, the owner must sell the rental property to 14    the tenant association or tenant on those terms. If the 15    applicable closing period ends on a Saturday, Sunday, or 16    other legal holiday in the State, then the closing occur 17    on the first business day thereafter. If the rental 18    property is conveyed to the tenant association or tenant 19    under the right of first refusal, any prepaid rent is 20    apportioned as of the closing date and applied on account 21    of the purchase price.22    (f) Tenant association's rejection of offer. If the tenant 23association or tenant fails to exercise its right of first 24refusal on or before the deadline set forth in subsection 25(d)(1), terminates the contract under its terms, or defaults 26unless there is a mutual default, then the right is deemed   SB3762- 13 -LRB104 18761 JRC 32204 b1waived and the owner may sell the rental property to the 2third-party purchaser identified in the third-party purchase 3agreement on the terms specified therein. If the sale to the 4third-party purchaser fails for any reason to close, or if 5there is any material change in the terms of sale from those 6set forth in the third-party purchase agreement, then the 7tenant association's, or tenant's, right of first refusal 8under this Act is reinstated. Any sale of the rental property 9by the owner to a different party or on any materially 10different terms is null and void.11    (g) Third-party rights. The right of a third-party to 12purchase a rental property is subject to the right of first 13refusal conferred by this Act. Upon exercise of the right of 14first refusal, the third-party purchase agreement between the 15owner and the third-party purchaser automatically terminates, 16and the owner or the tenant association or tenant or the rental 17building is not bound or in any way affected by the agreement, 18and the third-party purchaser does not have any interest in 19the contract between the owner and the tenant association or 20tenant formed by exercise of the right of first refusal. 21Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the owner 22and the tenant association or tenant may freely modify the 23terms and conditions on which the sale from the owner to the 24tenant association or tenant may be made. The time periods for 25exercising the right of first refusal under subsection (d)(1) 26and for closing under subsection (e) are minimum periods, and   SB3762- 14 -LRB104 18761 JRC 32204 b1the owner may grant the tenants a reasonable extension of a 2period without liability under a third-party agreement. 3Third-party purchasers are presumed to act with full knowledge 4of tenant rights and public policy under this Act.5    (h) Continuing right. The right of first refusal is a 6continuing right and applies to each owner of a rental 7property. The right of first refusal applies to all owners of a 8rental property including, but not limited to, any owner that 9acquired its interest in a sale to which the right of first 10refusal applied but was not exercised. The extended timelines 11granted in this Act for tenants to exercise the right of first 12refusal may only be exercised once after an owner places the 13rental property for sale or if there is a material change to 14the purchase price. 15    Section 30. Financial assurances; deposit. To exercise its 16right of first refusal in a rental property consisting of 5 or 17more dwelling units, the tenant association or assignee under 18Section 35 must provide the owner with a letter of interest or 19letter of intent from a community organization, lender, or 20community development financial institution indicating that 21the purchaser is in the process of obtaining preapproval for 22financing the purchase; and in a rental property consisting of 234 units or fewer, the tenant association, tenant under 24paragraph (3) of subsection (b) of Section 25, or assignee 25under Section 35 must provide the owner with a preapproval   SB3762- 15 -LRB104 18761 JRC 32204 b1letter from a lender. The owner may not require the tenant 2association or tenant under Section 25(b)(3) to pay a deposit 3of more than 5% of the contract sales price to make a contract. 4The owner must refund the deposit for a good faith failure of 5the tenant association or tenant to perform under the 6contract. 7    Section 35. Exercise or assignment of rights. A tenant 8association or tenant under Section 25(b)(3) may exercise the 9rights established under this Act in conjunction with a third 10party or by assigning those rights to any party whether 11private or governmental. Such an exercise or assignment may 12occur at any time in the process provided in this Act and may 13be structured in any way the tenant association or tenant 14under paragraph (3) of subsection (b) of Section 25, in its 15sole discretion, finds acceptable. The tenant association or 16tenant under Section 25(b)(3) must give the owner written 17notice of such third party or assignee within 10 business days 18of entering into a written agreement. Any rights conferred 19upon tenant associations or tenants under paragraph (3) of 20subsection (b) of Section 25, under this Act extend to any 21third parties or assignees, and, upon receipt of notice of 22such third parties or assignees under this Section, owners 23must treat the third parties or assignees in the same manner as 24tenant associations or tenant under Section 25(b)(3) under 25this Act.   SB3762- 16 -LRB104 18761 JRC 32204 b1    Section 40. Waiver of rights. 2    (a) An owner may not request a waiver of the right of first 3refusal conferred by this Act or require waiver of any other 4right under this Act.5    (b) An owner may not ask a tenant if the tenant intends to 6waive the right of first refusal during the period governed by 7Section 20. After the end of that period, an owner may ask a 8tenant, but may not require an answer, if the tenant intends to 9waive the right of first refusal.10    (c) In a rental property consisting of 5 or more dwelling 11units, if 50% of the tenants waive their right of first 12refusal, then the right of first refusal is waived and the 13owner does not need to wait for the period required by Section 1425. 15    Section 45. Notice. Any notice required by this Act is 16deemed to have been provided when delivered in person or 17mailed by certified or registered mail, return receipt 18requested, to the party to whom notice is required. 19    Section 50. Preservation as rent-restricted affordable 20housing. If a purchaser purchases a rental property and uses 21any public funds in the purchase, then the rental property 22must be maintained as affordable housing for no less than 30 23years. The Illinois Housing Development Authority must   SB3762- 17 -LRB104 18761 JRC 32204 b1establish procedures to ensure that each rental property 2acquired under this Act is subject to an affordable housing 3restrictive covenant that sets forth the manner in which the 4rental property is preserved as rent-restricted affordable 5housing. 6    Section 55. Duties of owner relative to existing 7tenancies. No owner may disturb any tenancy, other than for a 8just cause eviction, during the time periods set forth in this 9Act. 10    Section 60. Sale of property to third-party purchaser. If 11a tenant association or tenant under paragraph (3) of 12subsection (b) of Section 25, waives its right of first 13refusal, and the owner sells the rental property to a bona fide 14third-party purchaser, the purchaser must allow the current 15tenants to remain in their respective dwelling units for the 16longer of 6 months from the effective date of the sale or until 17each tenant's lease expires, at the same terms and conditions 18as before such sale. The purchaser may, with the agreement of 19the tenants, relocate the tenants to comparable units with 20comparable rents in accordance with procedures to be 21established by the rules of the Illinois Housing Development 22Authority. 23    Section 65. Rules. The Illinois Housing Development   SB3762- 18 -LRB104 18761 JRC 32204 b1Authority has the authority to adopt rules necessary to 2implement the requirements of this Act. 3    Section 70. Penalties. Any person who violates this Act 4must be fined not less than $200.00 nor more than $1,000.00 for 5each offense. Each day that a violation continues constitutes 6a separate and distinct offense to which a separate fine 7applies. 8    Section 75. Private right of action. Any aggrieved person, 9including, but not limited to, any tenant or tenant 10association, may enforce the provisions of this Act by a civil 11action in which the court may provide injunctive relief; award 12treble damages, the plaintiff's court costs, and reasonable 13attorney's fees.